South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5239.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 16-23-420(D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (D) This section does not apply to a guard, law enforcement officer, ora duly authorized member of the armed forcesArmed Forces of the United States while acting within the scope of his official duties, or a student of military science. A married student residing in an apartment provided by the private or public school whose presence with a firearm in or around a particular building is authorized by persons legally responsible for the security of the buildings is also exempted from the provisions of this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----